aghul_nouns.lexd
PATTERNS
Noun
(Noun Ergative)[^[1,2,8]] > (Case | (Locative Series))
(Noun Plural)[^[1,2,8]] > [:и] (Case | (Locative Series))

LEXICON Noun 
<n>:дад[1]
<n>:геда[2]
бахт<n>:бахт[8] 


LEXICON Plural
<pl>:ар[1] #plur on cons
<pl>:вур[2] #plur on vow

#Classes (эргатив, косвенные основы)
LEXICON Ergative
:а[1]
:йи[2]
:уни[8]


LEXICON Case
<erg>:
<gen>:н
<dat>:с
<instr>:лди
<post1>:фай
<post2>:хъай
<post3>:г1ай

LEXICON Locative
<loc1>:ф
<loc2>:гь
<loc3>:хъ
<loc4>:кк
<loc5>:к
<loc6>:'
<loc7>:л
<loc8>:гl

LEXICON Series
<calm>:
<futh>:ас
<clos>:ди
